Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Amer-I-Can Pilot Program

§ 43-27-401.
Amer-I-Can Program established; objectives; policies and procedures; funding.

The Department of Human Services, Division of Youth Services, shall establish a pilot program to be known as the “Amer-I-Can Program.” The program is designed for youths who have been committed to or are confined at the Oakley Youth Development Center. The objectives of this program are:

To develop greater self-esteem, assume responsible attitudes and experience a restructuring of habits and conditioning processes;

To develop an appreciation of family members and an understanding of the role family structure has in achieving successful living;

To develop an understanding of the concept of community and collective responsibility;

To develop a prowess in problem solving and decision making that will eliminate many of the difficulties that were encountered in past experiences;

To develop skills in money management and financial stability, thus relieving pressures that have contributed to previous difficulties;

To develop communication skills to better express thoughts and ideas while acquiring an understanding of and respect for the thoughts and ideas of others; and

To acquire employment seeking and retention skills to improve chances of long-term, gainful employment.

The Division of Youth Services shall develop policies and procedures to administer the program and shall choose which youths are eligible to participate in the program.

The department may accept any funds, public or private, made available to it for the program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 580, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 471, § 8; Laws, 2010, ch. 554, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2011.